Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS]

§195D-1 Findings and declaration of
necessity. Since the discovery and settlement of the Hawaiian Islands by
humans, many species of aquatic life, wildlife, and land plants that occurred
naturally only in Hawaii have become extinct and many are threatened with
extinction, primarily because of increased human use of the land and
disturbance to native ecosystems.

All indigenous species of aquatic life,
wildlife, and land plants are integral parts of Hawaii's native ecosystems and
comprise the living heritage of Hawaii, for they represent a natural resource
of scientific, cultural, educational, environmental, and economic value to
future generations of Hawaii's people.

To insure the continued perpetuation of
indigenous aquatic life, wildlife, and land plants, and their habitats for
human enjoyment, for scientific purposes, and as members of ecosystems, it is
necessary that the State take positive actions to enhance their prospects for
survival. [L 1975, c 65, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 111, §2; gen ch 1993]

Law Journals and Reviews

Palila v. Hawaii Department of Land and Natural Resources:
State Governments Fall Prey to the Endangered Species Act of 1973, Jack R.
Nelson. 10 Ecology Law Quarterly 281.

Case Notes

In light of this chapter and having sought to secure
financial advantages under the federal Endangered Species Act, the State has
impliedly consented to be sued under that Act and may be required to eradicate
feral sheep and goats. 471 F. Supp. 985.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next